Nebraska, session 109, LB471.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB471 LB471
2025 2025
Section 1. No state agency or other state entity shall restrict the
use of, purchase of, or sale of any motor vehicle as defined in section
39-101 based on the energy source used to power any component of the
motor vehicle, including any energy source used for propulsion of the
motor vehicle or used for powering any function of the motor vehicle.
Sec. 2. No county, city, or village shall restrict the use of,
purchase of, or sale of any motor vehicle as defined in section 39-101
based on the energy source used to power any component of the motor
vehicle, including any energy source used for propulsion of the motor
vehicle or used for powering any function of the motor vehicle.
Sec. 3. The Department of Environment and Energy shall not seek, or
cause to be sought, any waiver from the federal Clean Air Act to enact
more stringent vehicle emission standards than required by the United
States Environmental Protection Agency.
-2-